Washington statutes.
RCW 2.12.100

Transfer of membership from Washington public employees' retirement system to judges' retirement system—Authorized—Procedure.

Any member of the Washington public employees' retirement system who is eligible to participate in the judges' retirement system, may by written request filed with the director and custodian of the two systems respectively, transfer such membership to the judges' retirement system. Upon the receipt of such request, the director of the Washington public employees' retirement system shall transfer to the state treasurer (1) all employees' contributions and interest thereon belonging to such member in the employees' savings fund and all employers' contributions credited or attributed to such member in the benefit account fund and (2) a record of service credited to such member. One-half of such service but not in excess of twelve years shall be computed and credited to such member as though such service was performed as a member of the judges' retirement system. Upon such transfer being made the state treasurer shall deposit such moneys in the judges' retirement fund. In the event that any such member should terminate judicial service prior to his or her entitlement to retirement benefits under any of the provisions of chapter 2.12 RCW, he or she shall upon request therefor be repaid from the judges' retirement fund an amount equal to the amount of his or her employees' contributions to the Washington public employees' retirement system and interest plus interest thereon from the date of the transfer of such moneys: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That this section shall not apply to any person who is retired as a judge as of February 20, 1970.

[ 2011 c 336 s 37; 1970 ex.s. c 96 s 2.]